District of Columbia statutes.
16-2822

Mediator costs.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the costs of mediation, if any, shall be equally shared by the parties.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 158(b), 257, 56 DCR 1117

History

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.

Effect of Amendments